Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0604

Election of directors and composition of board.

(1) Unless the organic rules require a greater number:

(a) At least one-third of the directors must be patron members; and

(b) A majority of the board of directors must be elected exclusively by patron members.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative association has investor members, the directors who are not elected exclusively by patron members are elected by the investor members.

(3) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, the organic rules may provide for the election of all or a specified number of directors by one or more districts or classes of members.

(4) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, the organic rules may provide for the nomination or election of directors by districts or classes, directly or by district delegates.

(5) If a class of members consists of a single member, the organic rules may provide for the member to appoint a director or directors.

(6) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, cumulative voting for directors is prohibited.

(7) Except as otherwise provided by the organic rules, subsection (5) of this section, or RCW 23.100.0202, 23.100.0416, 23.100.0417, and 23.100.0609, member directors must be elected at an annual members meeting.

[ 2019 c 37 s 604.]